Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1806
Conversational artificial intelligence service; representation or statement regarding mental or behavioral health care; prohibited.

An operator shall not knowingly and intentionally cause or program a conversational artificial intelligence service to make any representation or statement that explicitly indicates that the conversational artificial intelligence service is designed to provide professional mental or behavioral health care.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 17.
July 1, 2027